Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
COURTS-MARTIAL JURISDICTION

[§124A-31] Courts-martial of state military
forces not in federal service; composition; jurisdiction; powers and
proceedings. (a) In the state military forces not in federal service,
there are general, special, and summary courts-martial constituted like similar
courts of the armed forces of the United States. They have the jurisdiction
and powers, except as to punishments, and shall follow the forms and procedures
provided for those courts.

(b) The three kinds of courts-martial are:

(1) General courts-martial, consisting of a law
officer and not less than five members;

(2) Special courts-martial, consisting of not less
than three members; and

(3) Summary courts-martial, consisting of one
commissioned officer. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next